Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 65 CARE AND TREATMENT OF PERSONS WITH MENTAL HEALTH DISORDERS
27-65-119. Rights of persons receiving care or treatment.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until July 1, 2023.]

Each person receiving evaluation, care, or treatment pursuant to any provision of this article 65 has the following rights and shall be advised of such rights by the facility:

To receive and send sealed correspondence. No incoming or outgoing correspondence shall be opened, delayed, held, or censored by the personnel of the facility.

To have access to letter-writing materials, including postage, and to have staff members of the facility assist the person if the person is unable to write, prepare, and mail correspondence;

To have ready access to telephones, both to make and to receive calls in privacy;

To have frequent and convenient opportunities to meet with visitors. Each person may see the person's attorney, clergyperson, or physician at any time.

To wear the person's own clothes, keep and use the person's own personal possessions, and keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of the person's own money.

A person's rights under subsection (1) of this section may be denied for good cause only by the professional person providing treatment. Denial of any right must in all cases be entered into the person's treatment record. Information pertaining to a denial of rights contained in the person's treatment record must be made available, upon request, to the person, or the person's attorney.

No person admitted to or in a facility shall be fingerprinted unless required by other provisions of law.

A person may be photographed upon admission for identification and the administrative purposes of the facility. The photographs are confidential and must not be released by the facility except pursuant to court order. No other nonmedical photographs may be taken or used without appropriate consent or authorization.

Any person receiving evaluation or treatment pursuant to any of the provisions of this article 65 is entitled to a written copy of all the person's rights enumerated in this section, and a minor child shall receive written notice of the minor's rights as provided in section 27-65-104 (6)(g). A list of rights must be prominently posted in all evaluation and treatment facilities.

27-65-119. Rights of respondents certified for short-term treatment or long-term care and treatment.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective July 1, 2023.

]

Each respondent certified for short-term treatment or long-term care and treatment on an inpatient basis pursuant to sections 27-65-109 and 27-65-110 has the following rights and shall be advised of such rights by the facility:

To be treated fairly, with respect and recognition of the respondent's dignity and individuality, by all employees of the facility with whom the respondent comes in contact;

To not be discriminated against on the basis of age, race, ethnicity, religion, culture, spoken language, physical or mental disability, socioeconomic status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression;

To retain and consult with an attorney at any time;

To meet with or call a personal clinician, spiritual advisor, counselor, crisis hotline, family member, workplace, child care provider, or school at all reasonable times;

To continue the practice of religion;

Within twenty-four hours after the respondent's request, to see and receive the services of a patient representative who has no direct or indirect clinical, administrative, or financial responsibility for the person;

To receive and send sealed correspondence, as well as to be given the assistance of facility staff if the respondent is unable to write, prepare, or mail correspondence. Facility staff shall not open, delay, intercept, read, or censor mail or other communications or use mail or other communications as a method to enforce compliance with facility staff.

To have the respondent's behavioral health orders for scope of treatment or psychiatric advance directive reviewed and considered by the court as the preferred treatment option for involuntary administration of medications unless, by clear and convincing evidence, the respondent's directive does not qualify as effective participation in behavioral health decision-making;

To have reasonable access to telephones or other communication devices and to make and receive calls or communications in private;

To have frequent and convenient opportunities to meet with visitors;

To see the respondent's attorney, clergyperson, or physician at any time;

To wear the respondent's own clothes, keep and use the respondent's own personal possessions, including the person's cell phone, and keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of the respondent's own money;

To have the respondent's information and records disclosed to family members and a lay person pursuant to section 27-65-123;

To have the respondent's treatment records remain confidential, except as required by law;

To have appropriate access to adequate water, hygiene products, and food and to have the respondent's nutritional needs met in a manner that is consistent with recognized dietary practices;

To have personal privacy to the extent possible during the course of treatment; and

To have access to a representative within the facility who provides assistance to file a grievance.

(2) A respondent's rights under subsection (1) of this section may be denied if access to the item, program, or service would endanger the safety of the respondent or another person in close proximity and may only be denied by a person involved in the respondent's care. Denial of any right must be entered into the respondent's treatment record. Information pertaining to a denial of rights contained in the respondent's treatment record must be made available, upon request, to the respondent, the respondent's legal guardian, or the respondent's attorney.

(3) A respondent admitted to or in a facility must not be fingerprinted unless required by other provisions of law.

(4) A respondent may be photographed upon admission for identification and the administrative purposes of the facility. The photographs are confidential and must not be released by the facility except pursuant to court order. Nonmedical photographs shall not be taken or used without appropriate consent or authorization.

(5) Any respondent receiving evaluation or treatment under any of the provisions of this article 65 is entitled to a written copy and verbal description in a language or modality accessible to the person of all the rights enumerated in this section, and a minor child must receive written notice of the minor's rights as provided in section 27-65-104 (6)(g). A list of the rights must be prominently posted in all evaluation and treatment facilities in the predominant languages of the community and explained in a language or modality accessible to the respondent. The facility shall assist the respondent in exercising the rights enumerated in this section.

(6) A facility shall not intentionally retaliate or discriminate against a person or employee for contacting or providing information to any official or to an employee of any state protection and advocacy agency, or for initiating, participating in, or testifying in a grievance procedure or in an action for any remedy authorized pursuant to this section. Any facility that violates this subsection (6) commits an unclassified misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars.

(7) Any respondent whose rights are denied or violated pursuant to this section has the right to file a compliant against the facility with the behavioral health administration and the department of public health and environment.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3196, § 1, effective August 10; entire section amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3220, § 5, effective July 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-65-117 as it existed prior to 2022.

Cross references:

For rights of persons in custody upon criminal charges, see part 4 of article 3 of title 16.

27-65-120. Administration or monitoring of medications to persons receiving treatment.

The commissioner has the power to direct the administration or monitoring of medications in conformity with part 3 of article 1.5 of title 25 to persons receiving treatment in facilities designated pursuant to this article 65.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1541, § 120, effective July 1; Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3197, § 1, effective August 10.

27-65-121. Employment of persons in a facility - rules.

The BHA shall adopt rules governing the employment and compensation for the administration of care or treatment to persons receiving care or treatment pursuant to this article 65. The BHA shall establish standards for reasonable compensation for such employment.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1541, § 121, effective July 1; Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3197, § 1, effective August 10.

27-65-122. Voting in public elections.

Any person receiving evaluation, care, or treatment pursuant to this article 65 must be given the opportunity to exercise the person's right to register and to vote in primary and general elections. The agency or facility providing evaluation, care, or treatment shall assist the person, upon the person's request, to obtain voter registration forms and mail ballots and to comply with any other prerequisite for voting.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3197, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-65-120 as it existed prior to 2022.

27-65-123. Records.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all information obtained and records prepared in the course of providing any services to any person pursuant to any provision of this article 65 are confidential and privileged matter. The information and records may be disclosed only:

In communications between qualified professional personnel in the provision of services or appropriate referrals;

When the recipient of services designates persons to whom information or records may be released; but, if a recipient of services is a ward or conservatee and the ward's or conservatee's guardian or conservator designates, in writing, persons to whom records or information may be disclosed, the designation is valid in lieu of the designation by the recipient; except that nothing in this section compels a physician, psychologist, social worker, nurse, attorney, or other professional personnel to reveal information that has been given to the person in confidence by members of a patient's family or other informants;

To the extent necessary to make claims on behalf of a recipient of aid, insurance, or medical assistance to which the recipient may be entitled;

If the BHA has promulgated rules for the conduct of research. Such rules must include, but are not limited to, the requirement that all researchers must sign an oath of confidentiality. All identifying information concerning individual patients, including names, addresses, telephone numbers, and social security numbers, must not be disclosed for research purposes.

To the courts, as necessary for the administration of this article 65;

To persons authorized by an order of court after notice and opportunity for hearing to the person to whom the record or information pertains and the custodian of the record or information pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure;

To family members upon admission of a person with a mental health disorder for inpatient or residential care and treatment. The only information that may be released pursuant to this subsection (1)(g) is the location and fact of admission of the person with a mental health disorder who is receiving care and treatment. The disclosure of location is governed by the procedures in section 27-65-124 and is subject to review pursuant to section 27-65-124.

To family members or a lay person actively participating in the care and treatment of a person with a mental health disorder, regardless of the length of the participation. The information released pursuant to this subsection (1)(h) is limited to one or more of the following: The diagnosis, the prognosis, the need for hospitalization and anticipated length of stay, the discharge plan, the medication administered and side effects of the medication, and the short-term and long-term treatment goals. The disclosure is governed by the procedures in section 27-65-124 (2) and is subject to review pursuant to section 27-65-124.

In accordance with state and federal law to the agency designated pursuant to the federal "Protection and Advocacy for Individuals with Mental Illness Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 10801 et seq., as the governor's protection and advocacy system for Colorado.

Nothing in subsection (1)(g) or (1)(h) of this section precludes the release of information to a parent concerning the parent's minor child.

Nothing in this article 65 renders privileged or confidential any information, except written medical records and information that is privileged pursuant to section 13-90-107, concerning observed behavior that constitutes a criminal offense committed upon the premises of any facility providing services pursuant to this article 65 or any criminal offense committed against any person while performing or receiving services pursuant to this article 65.

Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to physicians or psychologists eligible to testify concerning a criminal defendant's mental condition pursuant to section 16-8-103.6.

All facilities shall maintain and retain permanent records, including all applications as required pursuant to section 27-65-106 (3).

Outpatient or ambulatory care facilities shall retain all records for a minimum of seven years after discharge from the facility for persons who were eighteen years of age or older when admitted to the facility, or until twenty-five years of age for persons who were under eighteen years of age when admitted to the facility.

Inpatient or hospital care facilities shall retain all records for a minimum of ten years after discharge from the facility for persons who were eighteen years of age or older when admitted to the facility, or until twenty-eight years of age for persons who were under eighteen years of age when admitted to the facility.

Nothing in this section prohibits or limits the sharing of information by a state institution of higher education police department to authorized university administrators pursuant to section 23-5-141.

Source:

L. 2022:

(1)(d) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1541, § 122, effective July 1; entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3198, § 1, effective August 10.

27-65-124. Request for release of information - procedures - review of a decision concerning release of information.

When a family member requests the location and fact of admission of a person with a mental health disorder pursuant to section 27-65-123 (1)(g), the treating professional person or the professional person's designee, who must be a professional person, shall decide whether to release or withhold such information. The location must be released unless the treating professional person or the professional person's designee determines, after an interview with the person with a mental health disorder, that release of the information to a particular family member would not be in the best interests of the person with a mental health disorder. Any decision to withhold information requested pursuant to section 27-65-123 (1)(g) is subject to administrative review pursuant to this section upon request of a family member or the person with a mental health disorder. The treating facility shall make a record of the information given to a family member pursuant to this subsection (1). For the purposes of this subsection (1), an adult person having a similar relationship to a person with a mental health disorder as a spouse, lay person, parent, child, or sibling of a person with a mental health disorder may also request the location and fact of admission concerning a person with a mental health disorder.

When a family member requests information pursuant to section 27-65-123 (1)(h) concerning a person with a mental health disorder, the treating professional person or the professional person's designee shall determine whether the person with a mental health disorder is capable of making a rational decision in weighing the person's confidentiality interests and the care and treatment interests implicated by the release of information. The treating professional person or the professional person's designee shall then determine whether the person with a mental health disorder consents or objects to the release of information. Information must be released or withheld in the following circumstances:

If the treating professional person or the professional person's designee makes a finding that the person with a mental health disorder is capable of making a rational decision concerning the person's interests and the person with a mental health disorder consents to the release of information, the treating professional person or the professional person's designee shall order the release of the information unless the professional person or the professional person's designee determines that the release would not be in the best interests of the person with a mental health disorder.

If the treating professional person or the professional person's designee makes a finding that the person with a mental health disorder is capable of making a rational decision concerning the person's interests and the person with a mental health disorder objects to the release of information, the treating professional person or the professional person's designee shall not order the release of the information.

If the treating professional person or the professional person's designee makes a finding that the person with a mental health disorder is not capable of making a rational decision concerning the person's interests, the treating professional person or the professional person's designee may order the release of the information if the professional person or the professional person's designee determines that the release would be in the best interests of the person with a mental health disorder.

Any determination as to capacity pursuant to this subsection (2)(a) must be used only for the limited purpose of this subsection (2)(a).

A decision by a treating professional person or the professional person's designee concerning the capability of a person with a mental health disorder pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(III) of this section is subject to administrative review upon the request of the person with a mental health disorder. A decision by a treating professional person or the professional person's designee to order the release or withholding of information pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(III) of this section is subject to administrative review upon the request of either a family member or the person with a mental health disorder.

The director of the treating facility shall make a record of any information given to a family member pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section and section 27-65-123 (1)(h).

When administrative review is requested pursuant to subsection (1) or (2)(b) of this section, the director of the facility providing care and treatment to the person with a mental health disorder shall cause an objective and impartial review of the decision to withhold or release information. The director of the facility shall conduct the review, if the director is a professional person. If the director is not available or if the director cannot provide an objective and impartial review, the review must be conducted by a professional person designated by the director of the facility. The review must include, but need not be limited to, an interview with the person with a mental health disorder. The facility providing care and treatment shall document the review of the decision.

If a person with a mental health disorder objects to the release or withholding of information, the person with a mental health disorder and the person's attorney, if any, must be provided with information concerning the procedures for administrative review of a decision to release or withhold information. The person with a mental health disorder must be informed of any information proposed to be withheld or released and to whom and be given a reasonable opportunity to initiate the administrative review process before information concerning the person's care and treatment is released.

A family member whose request for information is denied must be provided with information concerning the procedures for administrative review of a decision to release or withhold information.

A person with a mental health disorder may file a written request for review by the court of a decision made upon administrative review to release information to a family member requested pursuant to section 27-65-123 (1)(h) and proposed to be released pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. If judicial review is requested, the court shall hear the matter within ten days after the request, and the court shall give notice to the person with a mental health disorder and the person's attorney, the treating professional person, and the person who made the decision upon administrative review of the time and place of the hearing. The hearing must be conducted in the same manner as other civil proceedings before the court.

In order to allow a person with a mental health disorder an opportunity to seek judicial review, the treating facility or the treating professional person or the professional person's designee shall not release information requested pursuant to section 27-65-123 (1)(h) until five days after the determination upon administrative review of the director or the director's designee is received by the person with a mental health disorder, and, once judicial review is requested, the treating facility or the treating professional person or the professional person's designee shall not release information except by court order. However, if the person with a mental health disorder indicates an intention not to appeal a determination upon administrative review that is adverse to the person concerning the release of information, the information may be released less than five days after the determination upon review is received by the person with a mental health disorder.

This section provides for the release of information only and is not deemed to authorize the release of the written medical record without authorization by the patient or as otherwise provided by law.

For purposes of this section, the treating professional person's designee shall be a professional person.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3199, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-65-122 as it existed prior to 2022.

27-65-125. Treatment in federal facilities.

If a person is certified pursuant to this article 65 and is eligible for hospital care or treatment by an agency of the United States, and if a certificate of notification from the agency showing that facilities are available and that the person is eligible for care or treatment is received, the court may order the person to be placed in the custody of the agency for hospitalization. When any person is admitted pursuant to an order of court to any hospital or institution operated by any agency of the United States within or outside this state, the person is subject to the rules and regulations of the agency. The chief officer of any hospital or institution operated by an agency in which the person is so hospitalized shall, with respect to the person, be vested with the same powers as the chief officer of the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo with respect to detention, custody, transfer, conditional release, or discharge of patients. Jurisdiction is retained in the appropriate courts of this state to inquire into the mental condition of a person so hospitalized and to determine the necessity for continuance of the person's hospitalization.

An order of a court of competent jurisdiction of another state, territory, or the District of Columbia authorizing hospitalization of a person to any agency of the United States has the same effect as to the person while in this state as in the jurisdiction in which the court entering the order is situated; the courts of the state or district issuing the order retain jurisdiction of the person so hospitalized for the purpose of inquiring into the person's mental condition and for determining the necessity for continuance of the person's hospitalization. Consent is given to the application of the law of the state or district in which the court issuing the order for hospitalization is located, with respect to the authority of the chief officer of any hospital or institution operated in this state by any agency of the United States to retain custody, transfer, conditionally release, or discharge the person hospitalized.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3202, § 1, effective August 10; Entire section repealed, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3240, § 56, effective August 10.

27-65-126. Transfer of persons into and out of Colorado - reciprocal agreements.

The transfer of a person hospitalized voluntarily pursuant to this article 65 out of Colorado or under the laws of another jurisdiction into Colorado are governed by the provisions of the interstate compact on mental health.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3202, § 1, effective August 10; Entire section repealed, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3240, § 56, effective August 10.

27-65-127. Imposition of legal disability - deprivation of legal right - restoration - repeal.

When an interested person wishes to obtain a determination as to the imposition of a legal disability or the deprivation of a legal right for a person who has a mental health disorder and who is a danger to the person's self or others, is gravely disabled, or is insane, as defined in section 16-8-101, and who is not then subject to proceedings pursuant to this article 65 or part 3 or part 4 of article 14 of title 15, the interested person may petition the court for a specific finding as to the legal disability or deprivation of a legal right. Actions commenced pursuant to this subsection (1) may include but are not limited to actions to determine contractual rights and rights with regard to the operation of motor vehicles.

The petition must set forth the disability to be imposed or the legal right to be deprived and the reasons.

The court may impose a legal disability or may deprive a respondent of a legal right only upon finding both of the following:

That the respondent is a person with a mental health disorder and is a danger to the respondent's self or others, is gravely disabled, or insane, as defined in section 16-8-101; and

That the requested disability or deprivation is both necessary and desirable.

Beginning January 1, 2023, the BHA shall provide periodic updates to the advisory board related to the implementation of House Bill 22-1256, including updates regarding whether the BHA will have the capability and capacity to assist emergency medical services facilities that treat a person under an emergency mental health hold find appropriate placement, when indicated, for the person at an inpatient or outpatient mental health facility or facility designated by the commissioner.

This subsection (3) is repealed, effective July 1, 2025.

To have a legal disability removed or a legal right restored, any interested person may file a petition with the court that made the original finding. No legal disability may be imposed nor a legal right be deprived for a period of more than six months without a review hearing by the court at the end of six months, at which time the findings specified in subsection (2) of this section must be reaffirmed to justify continuance of the disability or deprivation. A copy of the petition must be served on the person who filed the original petition, on the person whose rights are affected if the person is not the petitioner, and upon the facility where the person whose rights are affected resides, if any.

Whenever any proceedings are instituted or conducted pursuant to this section, the following procedures apply:

Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the respondent. The respondent may replace the attorney with an attorney of the respondent's own choosing at any time. Attorney fees for an indigent respondent are paid by the court.

The court, upon request of an indigent respondent or the respondent's attorney, shall appoint, at the court's expense, one or more professional persons of the respondent's choosing to assist the respondent in the preparation of the respondent's case.

Upon demand made at least five days prior to the date of hearing, the respondent has the right to a trial of all issues by a jury of six.

At all times the burden is upon the person seeking imposition of a disability or deprivation of a legal right or opposing removal of a disability or deprivation to prove all essential elements by clear and convincing evidence.

Pending a hearing, the court may issue an order temporarily imposing a disability or depriving the respondent of a legal right for a period of not more than ten days in conformity with the standards for issuance of ex parte temporary restraining orders in civil cases, but no individual habilitation or rehabilitation plan is required prior to the issuance of the order.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (5), all proceedings must be held in conformance with the Colorado rules of civil procedure, but no costs may be assessed against the respondent.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3203, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-65-127 as it existed prior to 2022.

27-65-128. Administration - rules.

The BHA shall promulgate any rules and develop and distribute any applications or forms necessary to consistently enforce the provisions of this article 65. The BHA shall proactively train providers, facilities, counties, judges, magistrates, intervening professionals, and certified peace officers on the procedures under this article 65, which training must include an understanding of the criteria for invoking an emergency mental health hold pursuant to section 27-65-106, the definition of "gravely disabled" and how a person who is gravely disabled may present physically and psychiatrically, and suggested templates and resources to be used by facilities to meet the requirements of section 27-65-106 (8)(a)(III) and (8)(a)(VII).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1541, § 123, effective July 1; Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3204, § 1, effective August 10.

27-65-129. Payment for counsel.

In order to provide legal representation to persons eligible for an attorney pursuant to this article 65, the judicial department shall pay, out of money appropriated by the general assembly, sums directly to the appointed attorney on a case-by-case basis or, on behalf of the state, shall pay lump-sum grants to and contract with individual attorneys, legal partnerships, legal professional corporations, public interest law firms, or nonprofit legal services corporations.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3204, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-65-129 as it existed prior to 2022.

27-65-130. Advisory board - created - service standards and rules.

An advisory board, referred to in this section as the "board", is established for the purpose of assisting and advising the commissioner in accordance with subsection (2) of this section in the development of service standards and rules. The board consists of no fewer than eleven but not more than fifteen members appointed by the governor, as follows:

One representative from the the department of human services;

One representative from the BHA;

One representative from the department of public health and environment;

One representative from the university of Colorado health sciences center;

One representative from a leading professional association of psychiatrists in this state;

One member representing proprietary skilled health-care facilities;

One member representing nonprofit health-care facilities;

One member representing the Colorado bar association;

One member representing consumers of services for persons with mental health disorders;

One member representing families of persons with mental health disorders;

One member representing children's health-care facilities; and

Other persons from both the private and the public sectors who are recognized or known to be interested and informed in the area of the board's purpose and function.

In making appointments to the board, the governor is encouraged to include representation by at least one member who is a person with a disability, as defined in section 24-34-301 (2.5), a family member of a person with a disability, or a member of an advocacy group for persons with disabilities, provided that the other requirements of this section are met.

The advisory board is responsible for recommending standards and rules relevant to the provisions of this article 65 for the programs of mental health services to those patients in any health-care facility that has either separate facilities for the care, treatment, and rehabilitation of persons with mental health disorders or those health-care facilities that have as the health-care facility's only purpose the care and treatment of such persons.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 70, § 93, effective February 25; IP(1)(a) and (1)(a)(II) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1541, § 124, effective July 1; Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3205, § 1, effective August 10.

27-65-131. Data report.

Beginning January 1, 2025, and each January 1 thereafter, the BHA shall annually submit a report to the general assembly on the outcomes and effectiveness of the involuntary commitment system described in this article 65, disaggregated by region, including any recommendations to improve the system and outcomes for persons involuntarily committed or certified pursuant to this article 65. The report must include aggregated and disaggregated nonidentifying individual-level data. At a minimum, the report must include:

The number of seventy-two-hour emergency mental health holds that occurred in the state and the number of people placed on a seventy-two-hour emergency mental health hold, including:

A summary of the reason each person was placed on an emergency mental health hold;

Demographic information of each person placed on an emergency mental health hold;

Disposition of each person placed on an emergency mental health hold;

How often a facility was required to ask for assistance from the BHA to find placement for the person pursuant to section 27-65-106 and if placement was found, the average length of time a person had to wait for the placement and the challenges encountered in finding a placement;

How many subsequent emergency mental health holds were placed pursuant to section 27-65-106 due to a lack of appropriate placement options; and

How each emergency mental health hold originated, whether by a certified peace officer; intervening professional, including specific professional type; or a court order;

The number and characteristics of each certification for short-term treatment, including an extension of short-term treatment, and long-term care and treatment that occurred in the state, including:

The number of inpatient versus outpatient certifications;

The reason for initiating each certification;

The number of certifications initiated by a court order, professional person, or certified peace officer;

The average length of each certification;

The demographics of each individual on a certification for short-term treatment;

The services provided;

The services needed that were not available; and

Any identified barriers preventing the provision of needed services;

The outcome of each certification for short-term treatment and certification for long-term care and treatment;

The reason each certification was discontinued; disaggregated by those successfully discharged; voluntarily discharged; transferred; not located, with treatment compliance concerns; unable to transfer to another facility or provider, for lack of payment to treatment providers; and for any other reasons;

The person's housing and employment status when certification was discontinued;

What services were provided versus what services were most frequently needed by people certified on an outpatient basis;

Barriers and opportunities with local providers, the judicial branch, and law enforcement; and

How many individuals were placed in the custody of the BHA on a certification for short-term treatment who were concurrently involved in the criminal justice system, including the outcomes of each person and any barriers and opportunities that may exist to better serve the population.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3206, § 1, effective August 10.